California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The board, subject to the approval of the voters within the portion of the county to which the tax would apply, may impose a maximum tax rate of one-half of 1 percent under this article and the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code). The board shall not levy the tax at a rate other than one-half or one-fourth of 1 percent unless specifically authorized by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 758, Sec. 9.   (AB 1413)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

125486.

The board, as part of the ballot proposition to approve the imposition of a retail transactions and use tax, may seek authorization to issue bonds payable from the proceeds of the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 658, Sec. 10.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

125487.

Any action or proceeding wherein the validity of the adoption of the retail transactions and use tax ordinance provided for in this article or the issuance of any bonds thereunder or any of the proceedings in relation thereto is contested, questioned, or denied, shall be commenced within six months from the date of the election at which the ordinance is approved; otherwise, the bonds and all proceedings in relation thereto, including the adoption and approval of the ordinance, shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 658, Sec. 10.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

125488.

The board has no power to impose any tax other than the transactions and use tax imposed upon approval of the voters in accordance with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 658, Sec. 10.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Personnel [125500. - 125600.]



  ARTICLE 1. Application [125500. - 125500.]

125500.

This chapter shall become operative on the date the district first begins to operate a public transit system pursuant to Section 125105.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Note: This section prescribes the operative date for Chapter 5, commencing with this section.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Employee Relations [125520. - 125527.]

125520.

Employees shall have the right to self-organization, to form, join, or assist labor organizations, to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing, and to engage in other concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1188.)
-------------------------------------------

125521.

Any question which may arise with respect to whether a majority of employees in an appropriate unit desire to be represented by a labor organization shall be submitted to the Public Employment Relations Board. In resolving those questions of representation, including the determination of the appropriate unit or units, petitions, and the conduct of hearings and elections, the board shall apply the relevant federal law and administrative practice developed under the Labor Management Relations Act, 1947, as amended, and, for this purpose, shall adopt appropriate rules and regulations.

The California State Mediation and Conciliation Service shall administer any rules and regulations and shall provide for a prompt public hearing
 and secret ballot election to determine the question of representation and shall certify the results to the parties.

Any certification of a labor organization to represent or act for the employees in any collective-bargaining unit shall not be subject to challenge on the grounds that a new substantial question of representation within the collective-bargaining unit exists until the lapse of one year from the date of certification or the expiration of any collective-bargaining agreement, whichever is later, except that no collective-bargaining agreement shall be considered to be a bar to representation proceedings for a period of more than two years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 135.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

125522.

Whenever a majority of the employees employed by the district in a unit appropriate for collective bargaining indicate a desire to be represented by a labor organization and upon determining, as provided in Section 125521, that the labor organization represents at least a majority of the employees in the appropriate unit, the district and the accredited representative of employees shall bargain in good faith and make all reasonable efforts to reach agreement on the terms of a written contract governing wages, hours, pensions, and working conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125523.

(a) A contract or agreement shall not be made with any labor organization, association, or group that denies membership on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code. However, the organization may preclude from membership any individual who advocates the overthrow of the government by force or violence. 

(b) The district shall not discriminate with regard to employment against any person on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, except as otherwise provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 788, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

125524.

If, after a reasonable period of time, representatives of the district and the accredited representatives of the employees fail to reach agreement on the terms of a written contract governing wages, hours, pensions, and working conditions or the interpretation or application of the terms of an existing contract, either party may request mediation services of the State Conciliation Service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125525.

If, after a reasonable period of time, representatives of the district and the accredited representatives of the employees fail to reach agreement either on the terms of a written contract governing wages, hours, pensions, and working conditions or the interpretation or application of the terms of an existing contract, upon the agreement of both the district and the representatives of the employees, the dispute may be submitted to an arbitration board.

The arbitration board shall be composed of two representatives of the district and two representatives of the labor organization, and they shall endeavor to agree upon the selection of a fifth member. If they are unable to agree, the names of five persons experienced in labor arbitration shall be obtained from the State Conciliation Service. The labor organization and the district shall, alternately, strike a name from the list so supplied, and the name remaining after the labor organization and the district have stricken four names, shall be designated as the fifth arbitrator and the chair of the board of arbitration. The labor organization and the district shall determine by lot who shall first strike a name from the list. The decision of a majority of the arbitration board shall be final and binding upon the parties thereto.

Each party shall be responsible for the expense of the presentation of its case. All other expenses of arbitration shall be borne equally by the parties and the expenses may include the making of a verbatim record of the proceedings and transcript of that record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125526.

If the district and the representatives of the employees do not agree to submit any dispute to arbitration as provided in Section 125525, the State Conciliation Service may be notified by either party that a dispute exists and there is no agreement to arbitrate.

Following that notification, the State Conciliation Service shall determine whether or not the dispute may be resolved by the parties and, if not, the issues concerning which the dispute exists. Upon that determination, the service shall certify its findings to the Governor. The Governor shall, within 10 days of receipt of certification, appoint a factfinding commission consisting of three persons.

The commission shall immediately convene and inquire into and investigate the issues in the dispute. The commission shall have authority to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and subpoenas duces tecum for the production of books, documents, and other records. Subpoenas shall be served and enforced in accordance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1985) of Title 3 of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The commission shall report to the Governor within 30 days of the date of its creation.

After the creation of the commission, and for 30 days after the commission has made its report to the Governor, no change, except by mutual agreement, shall be made by the parties to the controversy in the conditions out of which the dispute arose, and service to the public shall be provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125527.

If an exclusive collective-bargaining representative is selected pursuant to Section 125521, the provisions of Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code are not applicable to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Rights of Employees of Existing Facilities [125540. - 125541.]

125540.

Whenever the district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned utility, either in proceedings by eminent domain or otherwise, to the extent necessary for operation of facilities, all of the employees of the utility whose duties pertain to the facilities acquired who have been employed by the utility for at least 75 days shall be appointed to comparable positions by the board without examination. These employees shall be given sick leave, seniority, and vacation credits in accordance with the records of the acquired public utility. No employee of any acquired public utility shall suffer any worsening of wages, seniority, pension, vacation, or other benefits by reason of the acquisition.

Whenever the district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned utility, either in proceedings in eminent domain or otherwise, the district shall assume and observe all existing labor contracts.

The provisions of this section shall apply only to those officers or supervisory employees of the acquired utility as shall be designated by the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125541.

Whenever the district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned utility, either in proceedings in eminent domain or otherwise, that has a pension plan in operation, members and beneficiaries of that pension plan shall continue to have the rights, privileges, benefits, obligations and status with respect to that established system. The outstanding obligations and liabilities of that public utility by reason of that pension plan shall be considered and taken into account and allowance made therefor in the purchase price of that public utility. The persons entitled to pension benefits as provided for in this section and the benefits which are provided shall be specified in the agreement or order by which any public utility is acquired by the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Pension Plan [125550. - 125552.]

125550.

(a) The adoption, terms, and conditions of a pension plan covering employees of the district in a bargaining unit represented by a labor organization shall be pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement between that organization and the district and shall be subject to this section.

(b) The pension plan and the funds of the plan shall be managed and administered by a retirement board composed of equal representation of labor and management. Any deadlock among the members of the board with respect to that management and administration shall be resolved in the manner specified in Section 302 of the federal Labor Management Relations Act, 1947 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 186(c)(5)).

(c) The duties and responsibilities of the retirement board shall be executed in accordance with Section 17 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(d) This section does not apply if the district has, pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement, provided membership for the district’s represented employees in the Public Employees’ Retirement System, a retirement system established pursuant to the County Employees Retirement Law of 1937, or a pension trust subject to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125551.

The district may contract with the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, and in that case the board of administration shall enter into a contract with the district, to enter all, or any portion, of the employees of the district under that system; provided, that no employees of the district in a bargaining unit that is represented by a labor organization shall be included in the contract except as authorized by a collective-bargaining agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125552.

All persons receiving pension benefits from an acquired public utility, and all persons entitled to pension benefits under any pension plan of the acquired public utility, may become members or receive pensions under a pension plan established by the district by mutual agreement of those persons and the district. The agreement may provide for the waiver of all rights, privileges, benefits, and status with respect to the pension plan of the acquired public utility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Other Benefits [125560. - 125561.]

125560.

The district shall take such steps as may be necessary to obtain coverage for the board and its employees under Subchapter II of the Federal Social Security Act, as amended, and the related provisions of the Federal Contributions Act, as amended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125561.

The district shall take such steps as may be necessary to obtain coverage for the board and its employees under the workers’ compensation, unemployment compensation, and disability and unemployment insurance laws of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Transit Police Force [125600. - 125600.]

125600.

The district may establish and maintain a police force. Those employees of the district appointed by the executive director to the police force and who are duly sworn are peace officers, subject to Section 830.33 of the Penal Code. The district shall comply with the standards for recruitment and training of peace officers established by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training pursuant to Title 4 (commencing with Section 13500) of Part 4 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Bonds and Other Evidences of Indebtedness [125700. - 125716.]

125700.

The district may issue bonds, payable from revenue of any facility or enterprise to be acquired or constructed by the district, in the manner provided by the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law are applicable to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125701.

The district is a local agency within the meaning of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). The term “enterprise,” as used in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, for all purposes of this chapter, includes the transit system or any or all transit facilities and all additions, extensions, and improvements thereto authorized to be acquired, constructed, or completed by the district.

The district may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 for any one or more transit facilities authorized to be acquired, constructed, or completed by the district or for transit equipment described in Section 125702 authorized to be acquired by the district or, in the alternative, the district may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 for the acquisition, construction, and completion of any one of those transit facilities or for transit equipment described in Section 125702 authorized to be acquired by the district.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits the district from availing itself of, or making use of, any procedure provided in this chapter for the issuance of bonds of any type or character for any of the transit facilities authorized hereunder, and all proceedings may be carried on simultaneously or, in the alternative, as the district may determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125702.

The district may purchase transit equipment such as cars, trolley buses, motorbuses, light rail vehicles, or rolling equipment, and may execute agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates in the forms customarily used by private corporations engaged in the transit business appropriate to effect the purchase and leasing of transit equipment, and may dispose of the equipment trust certificates upon the terms and conditions that the district may deem appropriate.

Payment for transit equipment, or rentals therefor, may be made in installments, and the deferred installments may be evidenced by equipment trust certificates that are or will be legally available to the district. Title to the equipment may not vest in the district until the equipment trust certificates are paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125703.

The agreement to purchase or lease transit equipment may direct the vendor or lessor to sell and assign or lease the transit equipment to a bank or trust company duly authorized to transact business in the state as trustee for the benefit and security of the equipment trust certificates, and may direct the trustee to deliver the transit equipment to one or more designated officers of the district and may authorize the district to simultaneously therewith execute and deliver an installment purchase agreement or a lease of that equipment to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125704.

The agreements and leases shall be duly acknowledged before a person authorized by law to take acknowledgments of deeds and in the form required for acknowledgment of deeds.

The agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates shall be authorized by resolution of the board and shall contain covenants, conditions, and provisions that may be deemed necessary or appropriate to insure the payment of the equipment trust certificates from any legally available source or sources of funds as may be specified in the certificates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 594, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

125705.

The covenants, conditions, and provisions of the agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates may not conflict with any trust agreement or similar document securing the payment of bonds, notes, or certificates of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125706.

An executed copy of each agreement and lease shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, for a fee of one dollar ($1) for each copy filed.

The filing constitutes notice to any subsequent judgment creditor or any subsequent purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 594, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

125707.

The Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code), and the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Streets and Highways Code), are applicable to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125708.

Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 99000) of Part 11 of Division 10 is applicable to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125709.

The district shall be considered a “local agency,” as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 53317 of the Government Code, and the provisions of Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code are applicable to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125710.

The district shall be considered to be a “local agency” as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 6585 of the Government Code, and Article 4 (commencing with Section 6584) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code is applicable to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125711.

The district may borrow money in accordance with Article 7 (commencing with Section 53820), Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 53850), or Article 7.7 (commencing with Section 53859) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125712.

The district may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of bonds that have been authorized to be issued, but that have not been sold and delivered, and may issue negotiable bond anticipation notes therefor, and may renew the bond anticipation notes from time to time, but the maximum maturity of any bond application notes, including the renewals thereof, may not exceed five years from the date of delivery of the original bond anticipation notes.

The bond anticipation notes may be paid from any money of the district available therefor and not otherwise pledged. If not previously otherwise paid, the bond anticipation notes shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of the bonds of the district in anticipation of which they were issued. The bond anticipation notes may not be issued in any amount in excess of the aggregate amount of bonds that the district has not been authorized to issue, less the amount of any bonds of the authorized issue previously sold, and also less the amount of other bond anticipation notes therefor issued and then outstanding.

The bond anticipation notes shall be issued and sold in the same manner as the bonds. The bond anticipation notes and the resolution or resolutions authorizing them may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations that a resolution of the board of the district authorizing the issuance of bonds may contain.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125713.

The district may issue negotiable promissory notes pursuant to this section to acquire funds for any district purposes. The maturity of the promissory notes may not be later than five years from the date thereof. Those notes shall bear interest at a rate not to exceed 12 percent per year. Those notes shall be payable from any source of revenue available to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125714.

The district may bring an action to determine the validity of any of its bonds, equipment trust certificates, warrants, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125715.

All bonds and other evidences of indebtedness issued by the district under this chapter, and the interest thereon, are free and exempt from all taxation within the state, except for transfer, franchise, inheritance, and estate taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125716.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this division or of any other law, the provisions of all ordinances, resolutions, and other proceedings in the issuance by the district of any bonds, bonds with a pledge of revenues, bonds for any and all evidences of indebtedness or liability constitute a contract between the district and the holders of the bonds, equipment trust certificates, notes, or evidences of indebtedness or liability, and the provisions thereof are enforceable against the district or any or all of its successors or assigns, by mandamus or any other appropriate suit, action, or proceeding in law or in equity in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Nothing in this division or in any other law relieves the district or the territory included within it from any bonded or other debt or liability contracted by the district. Upon dissolution of the district or upon withdrawal of territory therefrom, that territory formerly included within the district, or withdrawn therefrom, shall continue to be liable for the payment of all bonded and other indebtedness or liabilities outstanding at the time of the dissolution or withdrawal as if the district had not been so dissolved or the territory withdrawn therefrom, and it shall be the duty of the successors or assigns to provide for the payment of the bonded and other indebtedness and liabilities.

Except as may be otherwise provided in the proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of any revenue bonds, bonds secured by a pledge of revenues, or bonds for improvement districts secured by a pledge of revenues, revenues of any kind or nature derived from any revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities, or property owned, operated, or controlled by the district shall be pledged, charged, assigned, and have a lien thereon for the payment of the bonds as long as they are outstanding, regardless of any change in ownership, operation, or control of the revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities, or property and it shall, in any later event or events, be the duty of the successors or assigns to continue to maintain and operate the revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities, or property as long as bonds are outstanding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12. COUNTY TRANSPORTATION COMMISSIONS [130000. - 130828.1.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions, Findings, and Definitions [130000. - 130010.]

130000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the County Transportation Commissions Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130001.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:

(a) Public demand for an efficient public transportation system in the southern California region resulting from population sprawl, the concentration of many transit dependent citizens in the large urban areas, and increasing mobility requirements indicates a need for improved, as well as more innovative, policy and decisionmaking institutions to resolve these problems.

(b) A basic purpose of transportation policy within the region should be to avoid undesirable duplication of transportation services, achieve the operation of a coordinated and integrated transportation system which will reduce automobile usage and dependency, reduce the consumption of scarce and expensive energy fuels, and reduce the levels of automobile-related air pollution.

(c) Recognizing the scarcity of resources available for all transportation development, the commissions shall give priority to low-cost highway and transit improvements, and shall work toward maximizing the effectiveness of existing resources available to the commissions.

(d) Recognizing the importance of the state highway system in the Los Angeles metropolitan area to bus, automobile, and freight transportation, it is necessary to maintain this highway system at least at its present operating standards and to increase the person-moving capability of this system by such methods as carpooling, improved traffic operations, exclusive busways, and fringe parking facilities.

(e) The transportation system should offer adequate public transportation to all citizens, including those immobilized by poverty, age, physical handicaps, or other reasons.

(f) The cities and local communities acting singly or jointly should be given more responsibilities for designing and providing local transit services to improve the responsiveness of public transit to public needs.

(g) The transportation decisionmaking process should be responsive to public values, and provide for the continuing involvement of the public in the preparation, revision, and discussion of transportation plans and services.

(h) Transportation planning should recognize that transportation systems have significant effect on the physical and socioeconomic characteristics of the areas served, and emphasis should be given to the protection and enhancement of the environment and the restoration of blighted neighborhoods near community centers. Los Angeles County, in particular, is a multicentered area with diverse socioeconomic levels and travel patterns, and a majority of the trips in the county are four miles or less.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130002.

As used in this division, “commission” means a county transportation commission created pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 130050).

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130003.

As used in this division, “local transportation zones” means cities or unincorporated areas which contain at least one economic center or major trip generator in which there is a large percentage of short- and medium-length transit trips. Local transportation zones shall be coordinated with regional transit operations as appropriate relative to consumer need and efficient operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130004.

As used in this division, “multicounty designated transportation planning agency” means the Southern California Association of Governments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130005.

The multicounty designated transportation planning agency shall conduct its meetings in the manner prescribed by the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code).

A majority of the members of the executive committee of the agency shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. All official acts of the executive committee shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the executive committee present, with not less than a quorum present.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130010.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c) of Section 130109, all provisions of the Orange County Transit District Act of 1965 (Part 4 (commencing with Section 40000) of Division 10), regarding employer-employee relations, employee benefits, and conditions of employment for the Orange County Transit District are equally applicable to the Orange County Transportation Authority as if set forth in this division, and govern employer-employee relations, employee benefits, and conditions of employment for the Orange County Transportation Authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 752, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Creation of Commissions [130050. - 130059.]

130050.

There is hereby created a commission in Los Angeles County, in Orange County, in Riverside County, and in San Bernardino County.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130050.1.

There is hereby created the Ventura County Transportation Commission. The commission shall be the successor agency to the Ventura County Association of Governments and shall assume all assets and liabilities of that association.

Notwithstanding Section 180050, the Board of Supervisors of Ventura County may designate the commission as the authority to carry out the provisions of Division 19 (commencing with Section 180000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1136, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

130050.2.

There is hereby created the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority. The authority shall be the single successor agency to the Southern California Rapid Transit District and the Los Angeles County Transportation Commission as provided by the act that enacted this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 60, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

130051.

The Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority consists of 14 members, as follows:

(a) Five members of the Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors.

If the number of members of the Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors is increased, the authority shall, within 60 days of the increase, submit a plan to the Legislature for revising the composition of the authority.

(b) The Mayor of the City of Los Angeles.

(c) Two public members and one member of the City Council of the City of Los Angeles appointed by the Mayor of the City of Los Angeles.

(d) Four members, each of whom shall be a mayor or a member of a city council, appointed by the Los Angeles County City Selection Committee. For purposes of the selection of these four members, the County of Los Angeles, excluding the City of Los Angeles, shall be divided into the following four sectors:

(1) The North County/San Fernando Valley sector.

(2) The Southwest Corridor sector.

(3) The San Gabriel Valley sector.

(4) The Southeast Long Beach sector.

The League of California Cities, Los Angeles County Division, shall define the sectors. Every city within a sector shall be entitled to vote to nominate one or more candidates from that sector for consideration for appointment by the Los Angeles County City Selection Committee. A city’s vote shall be weighted in the same proportion that its population bears to the total population of all cities within the sector.

The members appointed pursuant to this subdivision shall be appointed by the Los Angeles County City Selection Committee upon an affirmative vote of its members which represent a majority of the population of all cities within the county, excluding the City of Los Angeles.

The members selected by the city selection committee shall serve four-year terms with no limitation on the number of terms that may be served by any individual. The city selection committee may shorten the initial four-year term for one or more of the members for the purpose of ensuring that the members will serve staggered terms.

(e) If the population of the City of Los Angeles, at any time, becomes less than 35 percent of the combined population of all cities in the county, the position of one of the two public members appointed pursuant to subdivision (c), as determined by the Mayor of the City of Los Angeles by lot, shall be vacated, and the vacant position shall be filled by appointment by the city selection committee pursuant to subdivision (d) from a city not represented by any other member appointed pursuant to subdivision (d).

(f) One nonvoting member appointed by the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 900, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

130051.1.

Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 130051, if a member appointed by the Mayor of the City of Los Angeles is not a member of the city council of that city, the person appointed may serve for 60 days without consent of the city council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 586, Sec. 2.   Effective September 2, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

130051.5.

Every member of the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority is subject to Section 87100 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 900, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

130051.6.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), each member of the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority shall serve a term of four years or until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. A member may be removed at the pleasure of the appointing authority. A member may be reappointed for additional terms without limitation on the number of reappointments. Other than the member initially appointed by the Governor, and members appointed to staggered terms pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 130051, the members initially appointed shall serve until January 1, 1997.

(b) The membership of any member serving on the authority as a result of holding another public office shall terminate when the member ceases holding the other public office.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 60, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Note: Repeal of previous version is operative April 1, 1993, by Sec. 23 of Ch. 60.)
-------------------------------------------

130051.7.
